North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143C. State Budget Act.
Article 6. Administration of the Budget.

Part 1. Certification and Administration of the Budget.

§ 143C-6-1.
Budget enacted by the General Assembly; certified budgets of State agencies.

Governor to Administer the Budget as Enacted by the General Assembly. — In accordance with Section 5(3) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution, the Governor shall administer the budget as enacted by the General Assembly. All appropriations of State funds now or hereafter made to the State agencies and non-State entities authorize expenditures only for the (i) purposes or programs and (ii) objects or line items enumerated in the Recommended State Budget and the Budget Support Document recommended to the General Assembly by the Governor, as amended and enacted by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act or any other act affecting the State budget. The Governor shall ensure that appropriations are expended in strict accordance with the budget enacted by the General Assembly.

Departmental Receipts. — Departmental receipts collected to support a program or purpose shall be credited to the fund from which appropriations have been made to support that program or purpose. A State agency shall expend departmental receipts first, including receipts in excess of the amount of receipts budgeted in the certified budget for the program or purpose, and shall expend other funds appropriated for the purpose or program only to the extent that receipts are insufficient to meet the costs anticipated in the certified budget.Except as authorized in

G.S. 143C-6-4

, excess departmental receipts shall not be used to increase expenditures for a purpose or program.

Certification of the Budget. — The Director of the Budget shall certify to each State agency the amount appropriated to it for each program and each object from all funds included in the budget as defined in G.S. 143C-3-5(d). The certified budget for each State agency shall reflect the total of all appropriations enacted for each State agency by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act and any other act affecting the State budget. The certified budget for each State agency shall follow the format of the Budget Support Document as modified to reflect changes enacted by the General Assembly.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2013-360, s. 6.12(m); 2017-57, s. 6.6(f).

Government Efficiency and Reform.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.5(a)-(f), provides: “(a) The Office of State Budget and Management shall contract for a Government Efficiency and Reform review and analysis of the executive branch of State government, which shall be known as NC GEAR. The purpose of the review and analysis is to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of State government and to identify specific strategies for making State government more efficient and effective. The review and analysis may examine entire departments, agencies, institutions, or similar programs in different departments. The review and analysis shall include an examination of the efficiency and effectiveness of major management policies, practices, and functions pertaining to the following areas:

“(1) The statutory authority, funding sources, and functions of each department, agency, institution, or program.

“(2) The organizational structure and staffing patterns in place to perform these functions and whether they are appropriate based on comparative data and other reasonable staffing criteria.

“(3) The measurement of each reviewed program’s outcomes, overall performance, and success in accomplishing its mandated or stated mission and subsequent goals, considering the resources provided to the program.

“(4) State and local responsibilities for providing government services and funding for those services, and whether these responsibilities should be reallocated.

(5) Personnel systems operations and management.

“(6) State purchasing operations and management.

“(7) Information technology and telecommunications systems policy, organization, and management.

“(8) The identification of opportunities to reduce fragmentation, duplication, and related or overlapping services or activities through restructuring of departmental organizations and streamlining programs.

“(b) All executive branch departments, agencies, boards, commissions, authorities, and institutions in the executive branch of State government, including receipt-supported agencies, and all non-State entities receiving State funds shall be subject to review and analysis. The chief administrative officer of each entity shall ensure full cooperation with the Office of State Budget and Management and provide timely responses to the Office of State Budget and Management’s request for information under the provisions of G.S. 143C-2-1(b).

“(c) The Office of State Budget and Management will work collaboratively with the Office of State Auditor to develop the review, analysis, and findings needed to produce a final report and recommendations to the Governor and General Assembly.

“(d) The contracting provisions of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and related State purchasing and budget regulations do not apply to NC GEAR; however, the Office of State Budget and Management shall report all external contracts for consultants or professional services within 30 days of their execution to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Fiscal Research Division, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(e) The Office of State Budget and Management shall submit an interim report of the NC GEAR’s analysis, findings, and recommendations to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Program Evaluation Division by February 15, 2014, and a final report by February 15, 2015.

“(f) Funds appropriated for NC GEAR shall be used to contract with consultants and other experts and to pay for travel, postage, printing, planning, and other related costs as needed to accomplish the objectives specified for the project. Funds appropriated for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium for NC GEAR shall not revert at the end of each fiscal year but shall remain available for expenditure for the project.”

§ 143C-6-2.
Methods to avoid deficit.

Appropriations. — Each appropriation is maximum and conditional. The expenditures authorized by an appropriation from a fund shall be made only if necessary and only if the aggregate revenues to the fund during each fiscal year of the biennium, when added to any unreserved fund balance from the previous fiscal year, are sufficient to support the expenditures.

Revenue Collections. — The Director, with the assistance of the Secretary of Revenue and other officials collecting or receiving appropriated State revenue, shall continuously survey the revenue collections. If the Director finds that revenues to any fund, when added to the beginning unreserved fund balance in that fund, will be insufficient to support appropriations from that fund, the Director shall immediately notify the General Assembly that a deficit is anticipated. The Director shall consult with the Chief Justice to identify expenditure reductions and other lawful measures the Chief Justice and Judicial Branch can implement to reduce expenditures. The Director shall report in a timely manner to the General Assembly a plan containing the expenditure reductions and other lawful measures as the Director is implementing in order to avert the deficit.

Local Governments Funds. — In exercising the powers contained in Section 5(3) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution, the Governor shall not withhold from distribution funds that have been collected by the State on behalf of local governments or funds that the General Assembly has appropriated to local governments unless the Governor has exhausted all other sources of revenue of the State including any appropriated surplus remaining in the treasury at the beginning of the fiscal period.In accordance with Section 19 of Article I of the North Carolina Constitution and the Due Process Clause of the United States Constitution, the State is prohibited from taking local tax revenue. This subsection does not authorize the Governor to withhold revenues from taxes levied by units of local governments and collected by the State.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2007-393, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-393, s. 6, effective October 1, 2007, added the next-to-last sentence in subsection (b).

§ 143C-6-3.
Allotments.

To receive the operating funds appropriated to it, a State agency shall submit to the Director, at intervals and in a format prescribed by the Director, a request for an allotment of the amount estimated to be required for the agency’s operating costs during the ensuing fiscal period. The Director shall approve or modify the allotment requests, and the State Controller shall implement the allotments as approved or modified by the Director.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

§ 143C-6-4.
Budget Adjustments Authorized.

Findings. — The General Assembly recognizes that even the most thorough budget deliberations may be affected by unforeseeable events; therefore, under the limited circumstances set forth in this section, the Director is authorized to adjust the enacted budget by making transfers among lines of expenditure, purposes, or programs or by increasing expenditures funded by departmental receipts.

Budget Adjustments. — Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 143C-6-1

, a State agency may, with approval of the Director of the Budget, spend more than was appropriated in the certified budget by adjusting the authorized budget for all of the following:

Line items within programs. — An object or line item within a purpose or program so long as the total amount expended for the purpose or program is no more than was authorized in the certified budget for the purpose or program.

Responses to extraordinary events. — A purpose or program if the overexpenditure of the purpose or program is:

Required by a court or Industrial Commission order;

Authorized under G.S. 166A-19.40(a)(1) and (c) of the North Carolina Emergency Management Act; or

Required to call out the North Carolina National Guard.

Responses to unforeseen circumstances. — A purpose or program not subject to the provisions of subdivision (b)(2) of this subsection, if each of the following conditions is satisfied:

The overexpenditure is required to continue the purpose or programs due to complications or changes in circumstances that could not have been foreseen when the budget for the fiscal period was enacted.

The scope of the purpose or program is not increased.

The overexpenditure is authorized on a one-time nonrecurring basis for one year only, unless the overexpenditure is the result of (i) salary adjustments authorized by law or (ii) the establishment of time-limited positions funded with agency receipts.

(b1)

If the overexpenditure would cause a department’s total requirements for a fund to exceed the department’s certified budget for a fiscal year for that fund by more than three percent (3%), the Director shall consult with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations prior to authorizing the overexpenditure.

(b2)

Subsection (b) of this section shall not be construed to authorize budget adjustments that cause General Fund expenditures, excluding expenditures from General Fund receipts, to exceed General Fund appropriations for a department.

Overexpenditures Reported. — The Director shall report quarterly, beginning October 31, to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on overexpenditures approved by the Director under subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection (b) of this section.

Overexpenditures in Senate Budget. — The President Pro Tempore of the Senate may approve expenditures for more than was authorized in the enacted budget for objects or line items in the budget of the Senate.

Overexpenditures in House of Representatives Budget. — The Speaker of the House of Representatives may approve expenditures for more than was authorized in the enacted budget objects or line items in the budget of the House of Representatives.

Transfers Between Line Items or Programs in General Assembly Budget Other Than Senate and House of Representatives. — Expenditures exceeding amounts authorized for programs, objects, or line items in the budget of the General Assembly other than those of the Senate and House of Representatives shall be approved jointly by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

Transfers in The University of North Carolina Budget. — Transfers or changes within the budget of The University of North Carolina may be made as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes.

Transfers Within the Office of the Governor. — Transfers or changes as between objects or line items in the budget of the Office of the Governor may be made by the Governor.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2007-117, s. 4; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 127(c); 2012-12, s. 2(x); 2013-360, s. 6.12(n); 2017-102, s. 26.

Cross References.

As to procedures to be followed when the Current Operations Appropriations Act does not become law prior to the end of certain fiscal years, see

G.S. 143C-5-4

.

NC WISE Positions.

Session Laws
2007-323, s. 7.22, provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-6-4

, the State Board of Education may, subject to the approval of the Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with the Office of Information Technology Services, and after consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, use funds appropriated in this act for NC WISE to create a maximum of 10 positions and incur expenditures necessary to maintain and administer the NC WISE system within the Department of Public Instruction.” For prior exceptions for the NC WISE System, see Session Laws
2006-66, s. 7.12(a), (b).

Session Laws
2017-119, s. 4, provides: “Limitation. — The Governor may not use the funds described in this act to make budget adjustments under

G.S. 143C-6-4

or to make reallocations under
G.S. 166A-19.40(c). Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the Governor from exercising the Governor’s authority under these statutes with respect to funds other than those described in this act.

“The Governor shall also ensure that funds allocated in this act are expended in a manner that does not adversely affect any person’s or entity’s eligibility for federal funds that are made available, or that are anticipated to be made available, as a result of Hurricane Matthew, the western North Carolina wildfires, or Tropical Storms Julia and Hermine. The Governor shall also, to the extent practicable, avoid using State funds to cover costs that will be, or likely will be, covered by federal funds.”

§ 143C-6-5.
No expenditures for purposes for which the General Assembly has considered but not enacted an appropriation; no fee increases that the General Assembly has rejected.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no funds from any source, except for gifts, grants, or funds allocated from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund in accordance with

G.S. 143C-4-3

.1, funds allocated from the Contingency and Emergency Fund in accordance with

G.S. 143C-4-4

, and funds exempted from Chapter 143C in accordance with G.S. 143C-1-3(c) may be expended for any new or expanded purpose, position, or other expenditure for which the General Assembly has considered but not enacted an appropriation of funds for the current fiscal period. For the purpose of this subsection, the General Assembly has considered a purpose, position, or other expenditure when that purpose is included in a bill which fails a reading, or if the purpose is included in the version of a bill that passes one house, but the bill is enacted without the purpose.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no fee shall be increased if the General Assembly has rejected an increase of that fee for the current fiscal period. For the purpose of this subsection, the General Assembly has rejected a fee increase when that fee increase is included in a bill which fails a reading, or if the fee increase is included in the version of a bill that passes one house, but the bill is enacted without the fee increase.

History.

2006-66, s. 6.4; 2006-203, s. 3; 2017-57, s. 36.12(i).

§ 143C-6-5.5.
Limitation on use of State funds for abortions.

No State funds may be used for the performance of abortions or to support the administration of any governmental health plan or government-offered insurance policy offering abortion, except that this prohibition shall not apply where (i) the life of the mother would be endangered if the unborn child were carried to term or (ii) the pregnancy is the result of a rape or incest. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit medical care provided after a spontaneous miscarriage.

History.

2011-145, s. 29.23(a).

§ 143C-6-6.
Positions included in the State Payroll.

Before a State agency establishes a new position or changes the funding of an existing position, the agency shall submit the proposed action to the Director for approval. The Director shall review the proposed action to ensure that funds for the action are included in the amount appropriated to the agency. If the Director approves the action, the Director shall notify the agency and the Controller of the approval. The Controller shall not honor a voucher in payment of a payroll that includes a new position or a change in an existing position that has not been approved by the Director.

Payments on behalf of employees for hospital-medical insurance, longevity payments, salary increments, and legislative salary increases, required employer salary-related contributions for retirement benefits, death benefits, the Disability Income Plan and social security for employees shall be paid from the General Fund or the Highway Fund, only to the extent of the proportionate part paid from the General Fund or Highway Fund, in support of the salary of the employee, and the remainder of the employer’s contribution requirements shall be paid from the same source that supplies the remainder of the employee’s salary.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to The University of North Carolina.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2007-484, s. 34.

§ 143C-6-7.
Compliance with Chapter and appropriations acts by State agencies.

Compliance With Chapter and Appropriations Acts. — Except as otherwise provided by law, all expenditures of State funds by a State agency shall be made in compliance with the State budget as enacted by the General Assembly and certified by the Director. If the Director finds that a State agency has spent or encumbered State funds for an unauthorized purpose, the Director shall take appropriate administrative action to ensure that no further irregularities occur and shall report to the Attorney General any facts that pertain to an apparent violation of a penal statute or an apparent instance of malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance by a person.

Repayment of Funds Spent for an Unauthorized Purpose. — In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, if the Director finds that a State agency violated this section, the Director shall withhold any future allocations for the unauthorized purpose and shall also withhold future allocations to the Department in an amount equal to the funds unlawfully spent.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

§ 143C-6-8.
State agencies may incur financial obligations only if authorized by the Director of the Budget and subject to the availability of appropriated funds.

Limitation. — Unless otherwise authorized by the Director as provided by law, purchase orders, contracts, salary commitments, and any other financial obligations by State agencies shall be subject to the availability of appropriated funds or available funds that are not State funds as defined in this Chapter. Any employment contract or salary commitment that is paid in whole or in part with State funds shall also be subject to this limitation.

Notice. — Any written purchase order, contract, salary commitment, or other financial obligation subject to this section shall include a clause that sets forth the limitation imposed by subsection (a) of this section. Where this section applies but there is no written document to which the limitation may be added, the entity that administers the State funds at issue shall notify the person or entity of the limitation.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2012-142, s. 6.13(a).

§ 143C-6-9.
Use of lapsed salary savings.

Lapsed salary savings may be expended only for nonrecurring purposes or line items.

Lapsed salary savings shall not be used to pay for litigation services provided by private counsel. As used in this subsection, litigation services and private counsel are as defined in G.S. 147-17(c1) and

G.S. 114-2.3(d)

. This subsection does not apply to litigation services provided by private counsel retained by the Judicial Department for the defense of an official or employee of the Department in any action arising from conduct undertaken in the course of the official’s or employee’s official duties and in which the Attorney General has declined to provide the litigation services.

Until otherwise provided by the General Assembly, the Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM) in conjunction with State agencies, as defined in G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(24), shall report on the use of lapsed salary funds at the end of each fiscal year. State agencies shall report to the OSBM on the use of lapsed salary, including all of the following:

The total amount of accrued lapsed salary funds by funding source.

The total number of full-time equivalent positions comprising the lapsed salary funds.

The total expenditure of lapsed salaries by purpose.

The legal authorization to expend lapsed salary funds.The OSBM shall report by October 1 of each year on the use of lapsed salary funds to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committees on Health and Human Services, Education, Justice and Public Safety, Transportation, Information Technology, General Government, and Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2017-57, s. 6.7; 2020-78, s. 20.1; 2021-180, s. 16.10(b).

Federal Grant Matching Funds.

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 19.9, as amended by Session Laws
2010-31, s. 19.1,
provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 143C-6-9

, the Department of Correction [Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety] may use up to the sum of one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) during the 2009-2010 fiscal year and up to the sum of one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) during the 2010-2011 fiscal year from funds available to the Department to provide the State match needed in order to receive federal grant funds. Prior to using funds for this purpose, the Department shall report to the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on the grants to be matched using these funds.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2007-323, s. 17.12, as amended by Session Laws
2008-107, s. 17.2.

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 15.2, provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-6-9

, the Administrative Office of the Courts may use up to the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) from funds available to the Department to provide the State match needed in order to receive grant funds. Prior to using funds for this purpose, the Department shall report to the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety and to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on the grants to be matched using these funds.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2007-323, s. 14.2.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 18A.1, provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-6-9

, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, Indigent Defense Services may use the sum of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from funds available to provide the State matching funds needed to receive grant funds. Prior to using funds for this purpose, Indigent Defense Services shall report to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the grants to be matched using these funds.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2007-323, s. 14.6, Session Laws
2009-451, s. 15.14, Session Laws
2012-142, s. 16.9, Session Laws
2013-360, s. 18A.3, and Session Laws
2015-241, s. 18B.2.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 16C.2, provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-6-9

, the Department of Public Safety may use funds available to the Department for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium to reimburse counties for the cost of housing convicted inmates, parolees, and post-release supervisees awaiting transfer to the State prison system, as provided in

G.S. 148-29

. The reimbursement may not exceed forty dollars ($40.00) per day per prisoner awaiting transfer. The Department shall report annually by February 1 of each year to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the expenditure of funds to reimburse counties for prisoners awaiting transfer.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2005-276, s. 17.2, Session Laws
2007-323, s. 17.6, and Session Laws
2009-451, s. 19.3.

§ 143C-6-10.
Flexible compensation plan.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director may establish a program of dependent care assistance and a flexible compensation plan for eligible officers and employees of State agencies as provided in

G.S. 126-95

. With the approval of the Director, savings in the employer’s share of contributions under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act on account of the reduction in salary may also be used as provided by

G.S. 126-95

.

History.

2007-117, s. 3(c).